dictionaries/tt_RU/tt_RU.aff
FLAG num
SFX 135 Y 1
SFX 135 0 мый .

SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 мибез .

SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 0 мыйбыз .

SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 мисез .

SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 мыйсыз .

SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 0 мик .

SFX 141 Y 1
SFX 141 0 мыйк .

SFX 142 Y 1
SFX 142 0 мыйм .

SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 0 мадым .

SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 мәдем .

SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 0 мадың .

SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 мәдең .

SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 мады .

SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 мәде .

SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 мадык .

SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 мәдек .

SFX 151 Y 1
SFX 151 0 мадыгыз .

SFX 152 Y 1
SFX 152 0 мәдегез .

SFX 153 Y 1
SFX 153 0 маганмын .

SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 мәгәнмен .

SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 магансың .

SFX 156 Y 1
SFX 156 0 мәгәнсең .

SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 маган .

SFX 158 Y 1
SFX 158 0 мәгән .

SFX 159 Y 1
SFX 159 0 маганбыз .

SFX 160 Y 1
SFX 160 0 мәгәнбез .

SFX 161 Y 1
SFX 161 0 магансыз .

SFX 162 Y 1
SFX 162 0 мәгәнсез .

SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 мимен .

SFX 164 Y 1
SFX 164 0 мыймын .

SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 мам .

SFX 166 Y 1
SFX 166 0 мәм .

SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 массың .

SFX 168 Y 1
SFX 168 0 мәссең .

SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 мас .

SFX 170 Y 1
SFX 170 0 мәс .

SFX 171 Y 1
SFX 171 0 мабыз .

SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 мәбез .

SFX 173 Y 1
SFX 173 0 массыз .

SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 мәссез .

SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 0 маячакмын .

SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 мәячәкмен .

SFX 177 Y 1
SFX 177 0 маячаксың .

SFX 178 Y 1
SFX 178 0 мәячәксең .

SFX 179 Y 1
SFX 179 0 маячак .

SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 0 мәячәк .

SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 маячакбыз .

SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 мәячәкбез .

SFX 183 Y 1
SFX 183 0 маячаксыз .

SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 мәячәксез .

SFX 185 Y 1
SFX 185 0 сен .

SFX 186 Y 1
SFX 186 0 сын .

SFX 187 Y 1
SFX 187 0 масын .

SFX 188 Y 1
SFX 188 0 мәсен .

SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 мә .

SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 ма .
