dictionaries/tt_RU/tt_RU.dic
актарыну/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
артмау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
бакырыну/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
билгеләү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
борнайлану/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
гарьсезләнү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
дөпелдәү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
дуамаллану/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
җирәндерү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
интернациональләшү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
йомшакландыру/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
кәнителләү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
киңәш-табышлашу/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
кодрәтләнү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
күзәү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
кыенлату/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
мактау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
менгезү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
өлгәшү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
ошанкырау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
регламентацияләү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
саксызлану/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
сөйкәлешү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
сыпырыну/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
тәкенү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
тәфтишләү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
төйгечләү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
токандыру/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
түнтәрү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
тыпырдау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
чалтырау/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
читенләшү/61,64,65,68,70,71,74,76,77,78,81,82,85,87,89,92,94,96,100,102,104,111,113,115,117,119,122,124,126,128,130,132,134,136,138,140,144,146,148,150,152,154,156,158,160,162,163,166,168,170,172,174,176,178,180,182,184,185,188,189
шәнкәю/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
ябыштыру/62,63,66,67,69,72,73,75,79,80,83,84,86,88,90,91,93,95,99,101,103,112,114,116,118,120,121,123,125,127,129,133,135,137,139,141,142,143,145,147,149,151,153,155,157,159,161,164,165,167,169,171,173,175,177,179,181,183,186,187,190
